Utah statutes.
4-21-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Marketing agency" means any transaction in which the seller is represented by a person who acts as an agent of the seller in the sale of cattle in that such person issues payment to the seller and is entitled to a commission based upon the sale;

(2)  "Producer" means any person who raises or feeds cattle;

(3)  "Purchaser" means any person who buys cattle;

(4)  "Seller" means any person who offers cattle for sale.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

